Hawaii statutes.
B. Volunteer
Personnel

§386-171 Volunteer personnel, medical,
etc., expenses. Any person who is injured in performing service for the
State or any county in any voluntary or unpaid capacity under the authorized
direction of a public officer or employee, and who has not secured payment of
the person's hospital and medical expenses from the State or the county under
any other provision of law and has not secured payment thereof from any third
person, shall be paid the person's reasonable hospital and medical expenses
under this chapter. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-160; HRS §386-171; gen
ch 1985]

Attorney General Opinions

State or county's liability for volunteer's medical expenses
where all or part paid by third person. Att. Gen. Op. 86-6.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next